Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 65.23 of Title 3, unless there

is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. As used in this section, “public airport” means an airport

open to use by all persons without prior permission of the airport

lessee or operator, and without restrictions within the physical

capacities of its available facilities.

B. A public airport that owns, operates, or leases parking

facilities shall grant free parking to a vehicle owned and occupied

as either a driver or passenger by a veteran who has been honorably

discharged from active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of

the United States or the Oklahoma National Guard and who has been

Req. No. 2711 Page 1

cert ified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or the

Armed Forces of the United States as having a disability of one

hundred percent (100%). Documentation certifying such disability

shall be presented to the public airport to waive any fee associated

with using such facility.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.

SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation

of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and

be in full force from and after its passage and approval.



60-2-2711 MSBB 12/16/2025 11:26:31 AM

























Req. No. 2711 Page 2